North Dakota, session 69, HB1362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 6-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Housing development loan fund - Continuing appropriation - Audit and costs of
administration - Transfer to general fund.
1. The housing development loan fund is a special fund in the state treasury. The Bank of
North Dakota shall administer the fund for the purpose of providing loans to banks in
the state to establish housing development loan programs to assist housing builders
and developers in the county in which the local bank is located.
2. Loans provided under this section:
a. May not exceed five million dollars in total to local banks in each county except
that loans to banks located in counties that receive more than five million dollars
of oil and gas gross production tax revenue allocations per year may not exceed
ten million dollars in total ;
b. Must have an interest rate equal to two percent; and
c. Must provide for repayment by June 30, 2030.
3. The Bank shall deposit in the housing development loan fund all payments of principal
and interest paid under a loan made from the housing development loan fund. The
Bank may use a portion of the interest paid on the outstanding loans as a servicing fee
to pay for administrative costs, including the cost of an audit of the fund in accordance
Page No. 1 25.0262.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
with section 6 - 09 - 29, which may not exceed one - half of one percent. All money
transferred to the fund, interest upon moneys in the fund, and payments to the fund of
principal and interest are appropriated to the Bank on a continuing basis for the
purpose of the requirements of this section.
4. The Bank shall transfer the balance in the housing development loan fund to the
general fund on June 30, 2030 .
5. The Bank may adopt policies and establish guidelines to administer this loan program
in accordance with this section.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - TRANSFER - GENERAL FUND TO HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT LOAN FUND - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$10,000,000, which the office of management and budget shall transfer to the housing
development loan fund during the period beginning with the effective date of this Act and ending
June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 3. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through June 30, 2030, and after that
date is ineffective.
SECTION 4. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.
Page No. 2 25.0262.02000